sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till stränginstrument > Gitarrtillbehör > Capos: Klämcapoer; Partiella Capoer; Glidande Capoer; Utlösningscapoer
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes > Accessoires pour guitares > Capodastres: Capodastres à pince; Capodastres partiels; Capodastres coulissants; Capodastres déclencheurs
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre sláčikové nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre gitaru > Kapodastre: Sponové kapodastre; Čiastočné kapodastre; Posuvné kapodastre; Spúšťacie kapodastre
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 弦樂器配件 > 吉他配件 > 移調夾: 夾式移調夾; 局部移調夾; 滾輪移調夾; 扳機式移調夾
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 弦乐器配件 > 吉他配件 > 吉他变调夹: 夹式变调夹; 部分变调夹; 滑动变调夹; 触发式变调夹
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 현악기 부대용품 > 기타 부대용품 > 카포: 클램프 카포; 부분 카포; 슬라이딩 카포; 트리거 카포
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori strumenti a corda > Accessori per chitarra > Capotasti: Capotasti a morsetto; Capotasti parziali; Capotasti scorrevoli; Capotasti trigger
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za gudačka glazbala > Pribor za gitare > Kapodasteri: Kapodasteri sa stezaljkom; Djelomični kapodasteri; Klizni kapodasteri; Okidač kapodasteri
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de cordas > Acessórios de guitarra > Transpositores: Capos grampo; Capos parciais; Capos deslizantes; Capos de gatilho
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Styginių instrumentų priedai > Gitarų priedai > Kapodasteriai: Spaustukiniai kapodasteriai; Daliniai kapodasteriai; Slankieji kapodasteriai; Trigeriniai kapodasteriai
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-kiegészítők > Gitárkiegészítők > Kápók: Bilincskápók; Részleges kápók; Csúszós kápók; Kiváltós kápók
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Gitar Aksesuarları > Kapolar: Kelepçe Kapoları; Parçalı Kapolar; Sürgülü Kapolar; Tetikleme Kapoları
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > String Instrument Accessories > Guitar Accessories > Capos: Clamp Capos; Partial Capos; Sliding Capos; Trigger Capos
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ εγχόρδων οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ κιθάρας > Καποτάστα (Capos): Clamp Capos; Partial Capos; Sliding Capos; Trigger Capos
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Jousisoitintarvikkeet > Kitaratarvikkeet > Capot: Puristincapot; Osittaiset capot; Liukucapot; Liipasincapot
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสาย > อุปกรณ์กีตาร์ > คาโป้: คาโปหนีบ; คาโปบางส่วน; คาโปแบบเลื่อน; คาโปแบบทริกเกอร์
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych > Akcesoria do gitar > Kapodastery: Kapodastery zaciskowe; Kapodastery częściowe; Kapodastery przesuwane; Kapodastery trigger
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za godala > Dodatki za kitare > Kapodastri: Kapodastri z objemko; Delni kapodastri; Drsni kapodastri; Sprožilni kapodastri
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde > Accesorii pentru chitară > Capodastre: Capodastre cu clemă; Capodastre parțiale; Capodastre glisante; Capodastre cu declanșator
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strengeinstrumenter – tilbehør > Guitar – tilbehør > Capoer: Klemmecapoer; Delvise capoer; Glidende capoer; Udløsercapoer
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Smyčcové nástroje – příslušenství > Kytary – příslušenství > Kapodastry: Svorkové kapodastry; Částečné kapodastry; Posuvné kapodastry; Trigger kapodastry
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til strengeinstrumenter > Gitartilbehør > Capoer: Klemme-capoer; Del-capoer; Glidende capoer; Trigger-capoer
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda > Accesorios para guitarra > Cejillas: Cejillas de cepo; Cejillas parciales; Cejillas deslizantes; Cejillas de gatillo
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для струнных инструментов > Аксессуары для гитар > Каподастры: Каподастры-прищепки; Частичные каподастры; Роликовые каподастры; Пружинные каподастры
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Saiteninstrumente > Gitarrenzubehör > Kapodaster: Klammerkapodaster; Halbkapodaster; Schiebekapodaster; Trigger-Kapodaster
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda > Acessórios para guitarra > Cravelhames: Cravelhames de grampo; Cravelhames parciais; Cravelhames deslizantes; Cravelhames de gatilho
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor snaarinstrumenten > Accessoires voor gitaren > Capo's: Klemcapo's; Gedeeltelijke capo's; Schuifcapo's; Triggercapo's
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за струнни инструменти > Аксесоари за китара > Каподастри: Каподастри скоба; Частични каподастри; Плъзгащи се каподастри; Тригерни каподастри
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器用品 > ギター用品 > カポ: クランプカポ; パーシャルカポタスト; スライドカポ; トリガーカポ
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện dành cho nhạc cụ dây > Phụ kiện guitar > Kẹp tăng tông: Kẹp tăng tông thông thường; Kẹp tăng tông một phần; Kẹp tăng tông dạng trượt; Kẹp tăng tông trigger